Utah statutes.
41-12a-602.   Filing of false report.
Any person who gives information required in a report provided for under
Section 41-12a-502, knowing or having reason to believe that the information
is false, or who shall forge or, without authority, sign any evidence of proof
of owner's or operator's security, or who files or offers for filing any such
evidence of proof, knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or
signed without authority, or who falsely swears or affirms when obtaining
license plates, a safety inspection, or a registration under Section
41-12a-303, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
